Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2008
Flag; requirements.

The flag on such birth certificate or school record shall be large enough so that any personnel looking at such birth certificate or record shall be alerted to the fact that such birth certificate or record is of a missing person.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 8.